Nebraska, session 109, LB664.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB664 LB664
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-906.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
84-906.02 (1) In addition to seeking information by other methods
and before publication of a notice under section 84-907, an agency is
encouraged to and may solicit comments from the public on a subject
matter of possible rule or regulation making by causing notice to be
published in a newspaper of general circulation of the subject matter and
indicating where, when, and how persons may comment.
(2) When considering the proposal or adoption of a rule or
regulation, an agency shall:
(a) Allow any person to submit comments or written materials or
other documentation in support or opposition to such proposal or
adoption;
(b) Allow for such submission to be accomplished electronically or
by mail; and
(c) Not require a person wishing to make such a submission to travel
to any particular location.
Sec. 2. Section 84-911, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-911 (1) The validity of any rule or regulation may be determined
upon a petition for a declaratory judgment thereon addressed to the
district court of Lancaster County if it appears that the rule or
regulation or its threatened application interferes with or impairs or
threatens to interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of
the petitioner. The petition shall be filed in the district court for any
county in which venue is proper under subsection (3) of this section. The
agency shall be made a party to the proceeding. The declaratory judgment
may be rendered whether or not the petitioner has first requested the
agency to pass upon the validity of the rule or regulation in question.
(2)(a) (2) The court shall declare the rule or regulation invalid if
it finds that it violates constitutional provisions, exceeds the
-2-

LB664 LB664
2025 2025
statutory authority of the agency, or was adopted without compliance with
the statutory procedures.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, statutory procedures shall not
include procedures provided under the Negotiated Rulemaking Act.
(3) Venue for filing a petition under this section shall be proper
in any of the following counties in Nebraska:
(a) The county where the petitioner resides;
(b) The county where the petitioner's principal place of business is
located;
(c) Lancaster County; or
(d) The county in which the agency has its headquarters.
(4) An agency shall not take any action to restrict venue in
contravention of this section.
Sec. 3. Original sections 84-906.02 and 84-911, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-